pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Componentes para equipamentos de áudio: Receptores de áudio e vídeo; Amplificadores de áudio; Interfaces de áudio; Mixers para áudio; Transmissores de áudio; Módulos de canais; Unidades DI; Fones de ouvido e headsets; Microfones; Processadores de sinal; Alto-falantes; Pacotes de acessórios para gravação em estúdio
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lydkomponenter: Lyd- og videomodtagere; Lydforstærker; Lydgrænseflader; Lydmixere; Lydsendere; Kanalfordelere; DI-bokse; Hovedtelefoner og headset; Mikrofoner; Signalprocessorer; Højttalere; Sæt til lydoptagelse
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音訊元件: 影音接收器; 音訊放大器; 音訊介面; 音訊混合器; 音訊發射器; 頻道控制列; 阻抗轉換器; 耳機與頭戴式耳機; 麥克風; 訊號處理器; 揚聲器; 錄音工作室設備綁售
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiokomponentit: AV-vastaanottimet; Vahvistimet; Audiorajapinta; Audiomikserit; Audiolähettimet; Kanavalohkot; DI-boksit; Kuulokkeet ja kuulokemikrofonit; Mikrofonit; Signaaliprosessorit; Kaiuttimet; Studioäänityssetit
it: Elettronica > Audio > Componenti audio: Ricevitori audio; Amplificatori audio; Interfacce audio; Mixer audio; Trasmettitori audio; Fascette canali; DI box; Cuffie e auricolari; Microfoni; Processori di segnale; Altoparlanti; Kit per studio di registrazione
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso komponentai: Garso ir vaizdo imtuvai; Garso stiprintuvai; Garso sąsajos; Garso maišytuvai; Garso siųstuvai; Integruoti priešstiprintuviai; Signalo konverteriai; Ausinės ir ausinės su mikrofonais; Mikrofonai; Signalų procesoriai; Garsiakalbiai; Studijos įrašų paketai
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Componentes áudio: Recetores áudio e vídeo; Amplificadores áudio; Interfaces de áudio; Misturadores áudio; Transmissores áudio; Pré-amplificador; Caixas diretas; Auscultadores e auriculares; Microfones; Processadores de sinal; Colunas; Conjuntos de gravação de estúdio
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudkomponenter: Ljud- och videomottagare; Ljudförstärkare; Ljudgränssnitt; Ljudmixar; Ljudsändare; Kanalremsor; DI-boxar; Hörlurar och headsets; Mikrofoner; Signalprocessorer; Högtalare; Studioinspelningssatser
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Elementy audio: Odbiorniki audio i wideo; Wzmacniacze audio; Interfejsy audio; Miksery audio; Transmitery audio; Tory sygnałowe; DI-boksy; Słuchawki i zestawy słuchawkowe; Mikrofony; Procesory sygnałowe; Głośniki; Zestawy do studiów nagraniowych
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiokomponenten: AV-Receiver; Audioverstärker; Audio-Interfaces; Audiomixer; Audiotransmitter; Channel Strips; DI-Boxen; Kopfhörer & Headsets; Mikrofone; Signalprozessoren; Lautsprecher; Studio-Aufnahmesets
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio komponente: Avdio in video sprejemniki; Avdio ojačevalniki; Avdio vmesniki; Zvočni mešalniki; Zvočni oddajniki; Kanalske enote; Direktne enote; Slušalke in slušalke z mikrofonom; Mikrofoni; Signalni procesorji; Zvočniki; Paketi za studijsko snemanje
es: Electrónica > Audio > Equipo de sonido: Receptores de audio y vídeo; Amplificadores de sonido; Interfaces de audio; Mesas de mezclas; Transmisores de audio; Canales de grabación; Cajas directas; Auriculares y auriculares con micrófono; Micrófonos; Procesadores de señales; Altavoces; Equipos de grabación en estudio
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Bileşenleri: Ses ve Görüntü Alıcıları; Ses Amfileri; Ses Arayüzleri; Ses Mikserleri; Ses Vericileri; Kanal Şeritleri; DI Kutuları; Kulaklıklar ve Kafa Üstü Kulaklıklar; Mikrofonlar; Sinyal İşlemcileri; Hoparlörler; Stüdyo Kaydı Setleri
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Componente audio: Receptoare audio și video; Amplificatoare audio; Interfețe audio; Mixere audio; Transmițătoare audio; Benzi de canal; Cutii de injectare directă (DI Box); Căști audio și căști audio cu microfon; Microfoane; Procesoare de semnal; Difuzoare; Pachete înregistrări în studio
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Συστατικά ήχου: Δέκτες ήχου & βίντεο; Ενισχυτές ήχου; Διεπαφές ήχου; Μίκτες ήχου; Πομποί ήχου; Λωρίδες καναλιών; Κουτιά μετατροπής σήματος (Direct Boxes); Ακουστικά (Headphones & Headsets); Μικρόφωνα; Επεξεργαστές σήματος; Ηχεία; Πακέτα ηχογράφησης στούντιο
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиокомпоненти: Аудио- и видеоприемници; Аудиоусилватели; Аудио интерфейси; Аудиомиксери; Аудиопредаватели; Канални модули; Директни кутии; Слушалки с микрофони; Микрофони; Сигнални процесори; Тонколони; Комплекти за студийни звукозаписи
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkomponensek: Hang- és videóvevők; Hangerősítők; Audio-interfészek; Hangkeverők; Hangadók; Csatornacsíkok; Közvetlen dobozok; Fejhallgatók és fülhallgatók; Mikrofonok; Jelfeldolgozók; Hangszórók; Stúdiófelvételi csomagok
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Bộ phận thiết bị âm thanh: Bộ nhận tín hiệu âm thanh và video; Bộ khuếch đại âm thanh; Giao diện âm thanh; Bộ trộn âm thanh; Bộ truyền âm thanh; Dải khuếch đại; Hộp khuếch đại; Tai nghe và tai nghe có micro; Micrô; Bộ xử lý tín hiệu; Loa; Bộ sản phẩm ghi âm studio
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvukové komponenty: AV přijímače; Zesilovače zvuku; Zvuková rozhraní; Mixážní pulty; Zařízení pro přenos zvuku; Kanálové pruhy mixážních pultů; DI-boxy; Sluchátka a náhlavní soupravy; Mikrofony; Signálové procesory; Reproduktory; Sestavy studiového vybavení
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > ส่วนประกอบทางเสียง: เอวีรีซีฟเวอร์; เครื่องขยายเสียง; อินเทอร์เฟซเสียง; เครื่องมิกซ์เสียง; เครื่องส่งสัญญาณเสียง; แชนเนลสทริพ; กล่องปรับระดับสัญญาณเสียง; หูฟังและชุดหูฟัง; ไมโครโฟน; ตัวประมวลผลสัญญาณ; ลำโพง; ชุดบันทึกสตูดิโอ
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Компоненты аудиосистем: AV-ресиверы; Звуковые усилители; Аудиоинтерфейсы; Микшеры; Передатчики звуковых сигналов; Канальные линейки; Директ-боксы; Наушники и гарнитуры; Микрофоны; Сигнальные процессоры; Колонки; Комплекты для студийной записи
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Composants audio: Récepteurs audio et vidéo; Amplificateurs audio; Interfaces audio; Mélangeurs audio; Transmetteurs audio; Tranches de console; Boîtes de direct; Casques et micro-casques; Microphones; Processeurs de signal; Enceintes et haut-parleurs; Kits d’enregistrement de studio
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Audio komponenty: Audio a video prijímače; Audio zosilňovače; Audio rozhrania; Zvukové mixéry; Zvukové vysielače; Mikrofónový predzosilňovač; Di-boxy; Slúchadlá a náhlavné súpravy; Mikrofóny; Signálové procesory; Reproduktory; Balíky štúdiových nahrávacích zariadení
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio dijelovi: Audio i video prijemnici; Audio pojačala; Zvučna sučelja; Audio miksete; Audio odašiljači; Studijska konzola; Sklopka s istosmjernom strujom; Slušalice i slušalice s mikrofonom; Mikrofoni; Signalni procesori; Zvučnici; Komplet opreme za studijsko snimanje
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydkomponenter: Lyd- og videomottakere; Lydforsterkere; Lydgrensesnitt; Lydmiksere; Lydsendere; Kanalstriper; Direktebokser; Hodetelefoner og headset; Mikrofoner; Signalprosessorer; Høyttalere; Studioopptakspakker
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频组件: 音频/视频接收器; 音频放大器; 音频接口; 音频混频器; 音频收发器; 声道放大器组; 阻抗转换器; 耳机/耳麦; 麦克风; 信号处理器; 扬声器; 录音室捆绑包
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Components: Audio & Video Receivers; Audio Amplifiers; Audio Interfaces; Audio Mixers; Audio Transmitters; Channel Strips; Direct Boxes; Headphones & Headsets; Microphones; Signal Processors; Speakers; Studio Recording Bundles
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audiocomponenten: Audio- en video-ontvangers; Audioversterkers; Audio interfaces; Audiomengpanelen; Audiozenders; Kanaalstrips; Direct boxen; Hoofdtelefoons en headsets; Microfoons; Signaalprocessoren; Luidsprekers; Studio-opnamesets
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 구성품: 오디오/비디오 수신기; 오디오 앰프; 오디오 인터페이스; 오디오 믹서; 오디오 송신기; 채널 스트립; 다이렉트 박스; 헤드폰/헤드셋; 마이크; 신호 처리기; 스피커; 스튜디오 녹음용 제품
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオ機器: AVレシーバー; オーディオアンプ; オーディオインターフェース; オーディオミキサー; オーディオトランスミッター; チャンネルストリップ; ダイレクトボックス; イヤホン・ヘッドセット; マイク; シグナルプロセッサー; スピーカー; スタジオレコーディングバンドル